Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1604
Entry for inspection or repair.

An occupant, upon reasonable request from the operator, shall allow the operator to enter a leased space for the purpose of inspection or repair. If an emergency occurs, an operator may enter a leased space for inspection or repair without notice to or consent from the occupant.

Laws 2017, LB492, § 4.